Utah statutes.
13-42-131.   Liability for the conduct of other persons.
If a provider delegates any of its duties or obligations under an agreement or
this chapter to another person, including an independent contractor, the
provider is liable for conduct of the person which, if done by the provider,
would violate the agreement or this chapter.
